apertium-en-lv.lv.dix
    <pardef n="mā/te__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tei</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tē</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>šu</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tēm</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tēs</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tēm</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tēm</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r>te<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fā/ze__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zes</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zei</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zi</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zē</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zi</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zes</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>žu</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zēm</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zes</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zēs</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zēm</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zes</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zēm</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zes</l>
          <r>ze<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__mute">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ei</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ē</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēm</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēs</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēm</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēm</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mut/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__mute"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Ines/e__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__mute"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="analīze"><i>analī</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="aste"><i>ast</i><par n="mut/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Inese"><i>Ines</i><par n="Ines/e__np"/></e>
    <e lm="atvere"><i>atver</i><par n="mut/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="audze"><i>aud</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="avīze"><i>avī</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bāze"><i>bāz</i><par n="mut/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dabasgāze"><i>dabasgā</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="draudze"><i>draud</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fakultāte"><i>fakultā</i><par n="mā/te__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="fāze"><i>fā</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="flote"><i>flot</i><par n="mut/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gāze"><i>gāz</i><par n="mut/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grāfiste"><i>grāfist</i><par n="mut/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hercogiste"><i>hercogist</i><par n="mut/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="indoeiropiete"><i>indoeiropie</i><par n="mā/te__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="jūdze"><i>jūd</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="karaliste"><i>karalist</i><par n="mut/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krīze"><i>krī</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="māte"><i>mā</i><par n="mā/te__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mute"><i>mut</i><par n="mut/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nogāze"><i>nogā</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nozare"><i>nozar</i><par n="mut/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paaudze"><i>paaud</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="piekraste"><i>piekrast</i><par n="mut/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pieredze"><i>piered</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="redze"><i>red</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="reize"><i>rei</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sardze"><i>sard</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="spuldze"><i>spuld</i><par n="fā/ze__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="stūre"><i>stūr</i><par n="mut/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vēsture"><i>vēstur</i><par n="mut/e__n"/></e>
